Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROJECT FOR PRIDE IN LIVING; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Project for Pride in Living for job training and workforce development services focusing on individuals who are unemployed or underemployed. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end